District of Columbia statutes.
23-585

Violation of condition of release on citation; failure to appear.

(a)

A person who knowingly fails to abide by a condition of release on citation issued pursuant to § 23-584(d)(1) before his or her first appearance before a judicial officer shall be taken into custody in accordance with § 23-581 and presented before a judicial officer.

(b)

A person who, having been released on a citation issued pursuant to § 23-584 or having posted bond pursuant to § 23-1110, willfully fails to appear as required shall:

(1)

If the offense is a misdemeanor, be fined or imprisoned for not more than the maximum provided for the offense for which such citation was issued; or

(2)

If the offense is a felony, be fined not more than $5,000 and imprisoned for not more than 5 years, or both.

(3)

For the purposes of this section, [§  22-357.01] shall not apply.

Apr. 24, 2015, D.C. Law 20-243, § 2(a)(4), 61 DCR 8320

History